Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska17-122
Hospital; establishment and control.

A second-class city shall have power to erect, establish, and regulate hospitals, and to provide for the government and support of the same.

Laws 1879, § 39, III, p. 201;

Laws 1881, c. 24, § 1, p. 194;

R.S.1913, § 5016;

C.S.1922, § 4185;

C.S.1929, § 17-124;

R.S.1943, § 17-122.